Hawaii statutes.
§651-11 Execution in order of receipt.
When there are several attachments against the same defendant, they shall be
executed in the order in which they are received by the police officer. [L
1905, c 84, §11; RL 1925, §2815; RL 1935, §4200; RL 1945, §10151; RL 1955,
§233-11; HRS §651-11]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next